Utah statutes.
4-21-1.   Purpose declaration.

The Legislature recognizes that production of beef is important to the economy of the state, and that its promotion is both necessary and desirable. The purpose of this chapter is to further the production and promotion of beef.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1979 General Session

